Massachusetts, session 194th, H1799.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 30 of chapter 266 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end of the first paragraph the following
sentence:-
If the larceny involved monies received through the uttering of a forged, altered or
counterfeit check, draft or order for the payment of money from any bank or other depository,
action may be taken before either the court having jurisdiction where the uttering took place or
where the payee bank or other depository’s main office is located.
SECTION 2. Section 37 of said chapter 266, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding at the end thereof the following sentence:-
Action may be taken before either the court having jurisdiction where the crime was
committed or where the main office of the bank or other depository are located.
of 2

SECTION 3. Chapter 266 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 37 the following new section:-
Section 37 ½ Check washing; penalties
Whoever engages in the act of check washing shall be punished by imprisonment in the
state prison for not more than ten years, or by a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars, if the
amount of funds fraudulently obtained or attempted to be obtained exceeds $1,200; or, if the
amount of funds fraudulently obtained or attempted to be obtained does not exceed $1,200, shall
be punished by imprisonment in jail for not more than two years or by a fine of not more than
$3,000.
For the purposes of this section, “check washing” shall be defined as the act of
intercepting a check or money order and chemically or otherwise altering the check or money
order to change the name of the payee, the dollar amount, or both and fraudulently cashing or
depositing, or attempting to cash or deposit, the check or money order.




of 2